California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
If a claimant for the veterans’ exemption fails to file the affidavit required by Section 255 because he or she was in the military service of the United States and serving outside of the United States between the lien date and 5 o’clock p.m. on February 15 of any year, the veterans’ exemption may be claimed pursuant to Section 252 or 253 without regard to the time limit specified in Section 255. If the veterans’ exemption is claimed pursuant to the preceding sentence, any tax, or penalty or interest thereon for any fiscal year commencing during the calendar year in which the exemption is claimed, on property to the amount of one thousand dollars ($1,000) owned by the person to whom the veterans’ exemption was available for that fiscal year, shall be canceled or refunded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 941, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

273.5.

(a) If a claimant for the veterans’ exemption for the 1976–77 fiscal year or any year thereafter fails to file the required affidavit with the assessor by 5 p.m. on February 15 of the calendar year in which the fiscal year begins, but files that claim on or before the following December 10, an exemption of the lesser of three thousand two hundred dollars ($3,200) or 80 percent of the full value of the property shall be granted by the assessor.

(b) On those claims filed pursuant to subdivision (a) after November 15, this exemption may be applied to the second installment, and if applied to the second installment, the first installment will still become delinquent on December 10, and the delinquent penalty provided for in this division will attach if the tax amount due is not paid.

If this exemption is applied to the second installment and if both installments are paid on or before December 10, or if the reduction in taxes from this exemption exceeds the amount of taxes due on the second installment, a refund shall be made to the taxpayer upon a claim submitted by the taxpayer to the auditor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 941, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

275.

(a) If a claimant for the homeowners’ property tax exemption fails to file the required affidavit with the assessor by 5 p.m. on February 15 of the calendar year in which the fiscal year begins, but files that affidavit on or before the following December 10, an exemption of the lesser of five thousand six hundred dollars ($5,600) or 80 percent of the full value of the dwelling shall be granted by the assessor.

(b) On claims filed pursuant to subdivision (a) after November 15, this partial homeowners’ exemption may be applied to the second installment, and if applied to the second installment, the first installment will still become delinquent on December 10 and the delinquent penalty provided for in this division will attach if the tax amount due is not paid.

If this partial homeowners’ exemption is applied to the second installment and if both installments are paid on or before December 10 or if the reduction in taxes from this partial exemption exceeds the amount of taxes due on the second installment, a refund shall be made to the taxpayer upon a claim submitted by the taxpayer to the auditor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 941, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

275.5.

If a person claiming classification of a vessel as a documented vessel eligible for assessment under Section 227 fails to file the affidavit required by Section 254 by 5 p.m. on February 15 of the calendar year in which the fiscal year begins, but files that affidavit on or before the following August 1, the assessment shall be reduced in a sum equal to 80 percent of the reduction that would have been allowed had the affidavit been timely filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 695, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

276.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by subdivision (b), for property for which the disabled veterans’ exemption described in Section 205.5 was available, but for which a timely claim was not filed, a partial exemption shall be applied in accordance with whichever of the following is applicable:

(1) Ninety percent of any tax, including any interest or penalty thereon, levied upon that portion of the assessed value of the property that would have been exempt under a timely and appropriate claim shall be canceled or refunded, provided that an appropriate claim for exemption is filed after 5 p.m. on February 15 of the calendar year in which the fiscal year begins but on or before the following December 10.

(2) If an appropriate claim for exemption is filed after the time period specified in paragraph (1), 85 percent of that portion of any tax, including any interest or penalty thereon, that was levied upon that portion of the assessed value of the property that would have been exempt under a timely and appropriate claim, shall be canceled or refunded. Cancellations made under this paragraph are subject to the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 4985) of Chapter 4. Refunds issued under this paragraph are subject to the limitations periods on refunds as described in Article 1 (commencing with Section 5096) of Chapter 5.

(b) If a late-filed claim for the one-hundred-fifty-thousand-dollar ($150,000) exemption is filed in conjunction with a timely filed claim for the one-hundred-thousand-dollar ($100,000) exemption, the amount of any exemption allowed under the late-filed claim
 under subdivision (a) shall be determined on the basis of that portion of the exemption amount, otherwise available under subdivision (a), that exceeds one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(c) For those claims filed pursuant to subdivision (a) after November 15, the exemption under that subdivision may be applied to the second installment. If that exemption is so applied, the first installment is still delinquent on December 10, and is subject to delinquent penalties provided for in this division if that installment is not timely paid. A refund shall be made to the taxpayer upon a claim submitted to the auditor if the exemption is applied to the second installment and either of the following is true:

(1) Both installments are paid on or before December 10.

(2) The reduction in taxes resulting from the exemption
 exceeds the amount of taxes due on the second installment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 211.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

276.1.

(a) For property for which the disabled veterans’ exemption described in Section 205.5 would have been available but the taxpayer had not yet received a disability rating from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs (USDVA), there shall be canceled or refunded the amount of any taxes, including any interest and penalties thereon, subject to the provisions regarding cancellations in Article 1 (commencing with Section 4985) of Chapter 4 and the limitations periods on refunds as described in Article 1 (commencing with Section 5096) of Chapter 5, levied on that portion of the assessed value of the property that would have been exempt under a timely and appropriate claim, provided that the claimant files an appropriate claim for the disabled
 veterans’ exemption described in Section 205.5 the later of 90 days of receipt of the disability rating from the USDVA or on or before the next following lien date.

(b) Subject to the provisions regarding cancellations and the limitations periods on refunds, the disabled veterans’ exemption shall apply beginning on the effective date, as determined by the USDVA, of a disability rating that qualifies the claimant for the exemption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 150, Sec. 1.   (AB 2314)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

276.2.

(a) If property becomes eligible for the disabled veterans’ exemption as described in Section 205.5 after the lien date, and an appropriate application for that exemption is filed on the later of 90 days after the date on which the property became eligible or on or before the next following lien date, there shall be canceled or refunded the amount of any taxes, including any interest and penalties thereon, levied on that portion of the assessed value of the property that would have been exempt under a timely and appropriate application.

(b) The entire amount of the exemption applies to any property tax assessment, including a supplemental and escape assessment, that was made and that
 served as a lien against the property. The exemption amount shall be appropriately prorated from the date the property became eligible for the exemption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 351, Sec. 9.   (SB 947)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

276.3.

(a) In the event that property receiving a disabled veterans’ exemption as described in Section 205.5 is sold or otherwise transferred to a person who is not eligible for that exemption, the exemption shall cease to apply on the date of that sale or transfer.

(b) In the event that property receiving a disabled veterans’ exemption as described in Section 205.5 is no longer used by a claimant as his or her principal place of residence, the exemption shall cease to apply on the date the claimant terminates his or her residency at that location.

(c) Termination of the exemption under this section shall result in an escape assessment of the property pursuant to Section 531.1.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1085) by Stats. 2002, Ch. 775, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

276.5.

If a person claiming the exemption of an aircraft of historical significance under Section 220.5 fails to file the affidavit required by that section by 5 p.m. on February 15 of the fiscal year for which the exemption is claimed, but files that affidavit on or before the following August 1, the assessment shall be reduced by an amount equal to 80 percent of the reduction that would have been allowed had the affidavit been timely filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 604, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

277.

(a) Any person claiming the disabled veterans’ property tax exemption shall file a claim with the assessor giving any information required by the board. This information shall include, but shall not be limited to, the name of the person claiming the exemption, the person’s social security number or another personal identifying number, the address of the property, and a statement to the effect that the claimant owned and occupied the property as
 the claimant’s principal place of residence on the lien date, or that the claimant intends to own and occupy the property as the claimant’s principal place of residence on the next succeeding lien date, and proof of disability as defined by Section 205.5.

(b) The executor, administrator, or personal legal representative of the claimant’s estate may file a claim with the assessor pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) The trustee of the deceased claimant’s trust assets may file a claim with the assessor pursuant to subdivision
 (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 430, Sec. 1.   (SB 667)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

278.

Prior to the lien date, the assessor shall annually mail a notice to all claimants who received the disabled veterans’ exemption in the immediately preceding year, except where such person has transferred title in the property since the immediately preceding lien date. The notice shall inform the taxpayer of the requirements that must be met in order to be eligible for the exemption, of the penalties if the taxpayer allows the exemption to continue when he or she is not eligible for the exemption, and of his or her duty to inform the assessor when he or she is no longer eligible for the exemption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 351, Sec. 10.   (SB 947)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

279.

(a) Subject to the provisions regarding cancellations and the limitation periods on refunds, property becomes eligible for the disabled veterans’ property tax exemption, as described in Section 205.5, as of:

(1) The effective date of a disability rating, as determined by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, that qualifies the claimant for the exemption.

(2) The date a qualified claimant purchases a property that constitutes the principal place of residence, provided residency is established within 90 days of purchase.

(3) The date a qualified
 claimant establishes residency at a property owned by the claimant or the spouse, as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 205.5.

(4) The date the veteran died, as a result of a service-connected injury or disease, in the case where the unmarried surviving spouse is the claimant.

(b) A claim for the disabled veterans’ property tax exemption filed by a qualified claimant, once granted, shall remain in continuous effect unless any of the following occurs:

(1) Title to the property changes.

(2) The owner does not occupy the dwelling as his or her principal place of residence.

(A) If the claimant is confined to a hospital or other care facility but principally resided at a dwelling
 immediately prior to that confinement, the claimant will be deemed to occupy that same dwelling as his or her principal place of residence on the lien date, provided that the dwelling has not been rented or leased as described in Section 205.5.

(B) If a person receiving the disabled veterans’ exemption is not occupying the dwelling because the dwelling was damaged in a misfortune or calamity, the person will be deemed to occupy that same dwelling as his or her principal place of residence, provided the person’s absence from the dwelling is temporary and the person intends to return to the dwelling when possible to do so. Except as provided in subparagraph (C), when a dwelling has been totally destroyed, and thus no dwelling exists, the exemption provided by Section 205.5 is not applicable until the structure has been replaced and is occupied as a dwelling.

(C) A dwelling that was
 totally destroyed in a disaster for which the Governor proclaimed a state of emergency, that qualified for the exemption provided by Section 205.5 and has not changed ownership since the disaster, will be deemed occupied by the person receiving a disabled veterans’ exemption provided the person intends to reconstruct a dwelling on the property and occupy the dwelling as his or her principal place of residence when it is possible to do so.

(3) The property is altered so that it is no longer a dwelling.

(4) The veteran is no longer disabled as defined in Section 205.5.

(5) The unmarried surviving spouse claimant remarries.

(c) The assessor of each county shall verify the continued eligibility of each person receiving a disabled veterans’ exemption, and
 shall provide for a periodic audit of, and establish a control system to monitor, disabled veterans’ exemption claims.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 202, Sec. 2.   (AB 188)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

279.5.

The taxpayer who has filed a claim for the disabled veterans’ exemption, once granted, is responsible for notifying the assessor when the property is no longer eligible for the exemption.

Upon any indication that a disabled veterans’ exemption has been incorrectly allowed, the assessor shall make a redetermination of eligibility for the disabled veterans’ exemption. If the assessor determines that the property is no longer eligible for the exemption, he shall immediately cancel the exemption on the property.

If a disabled veterans’ exemption has been incorrectly allowed, an escape assessment as allowed by Section 531.1 in the amount of the exemption with interest as provided in Section 506 shall be made, except where the exemption was allowed as the result of the assessor’s error, in which case the amount of interest shall be forgiven. If the exemption was incorrectly allowed because of erroneous or incorrect information submitted by the claimant with knowledge that such information was erroneous or incomplete or because the claimant failed to notify the assessor in a timely manner that the property was no longer eligible for the exemption, the penalty provided in Section 504 shall be added to the assessment. If the property subject to this paragraph has been transferred or conveyed to a bona fide purchaser for value during the period commencing with the lien date and ending July 1 of the fiscal year for which such exemption was incorrectly allowed, and the claimant is not the purchaser, any amount of penalty provided by Section 504 or any amount of interest provided by Section 506 imposed pursuant to the escape assessment due to such incorrect disabled veterans’ exemption shall be forgiven. If the property subject to this paragraph has been transferred or conveyed to a bona fide purchaser for value after July 1 of the fiscal year for which the exemption was incorrectly allowed, and the claimant is not the purchaser, the escape assessment shall be levied in accordance with Section 531.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 411, Sec. 10.   Effective July 11, 1980.   Operative January 1, 1981, by Sec. 51 of Ch. 411.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Audit of Veterans’ Exemption Claims [280. - 287.]

280.

Commencing on or after July 1, an audit of the exemptions granted pursuant to subdivision (o), (p), (q) or (r) of Section 3, Article XIII of the Constitution shall be conducted by the auditor. The audit shall cover such exemptions claimed for the current tax year as well as any prior tax years in respect to which escaped assessments would be timely pursuant to Section 532.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 3ll.)
-------------------------------------------

281.

The auditor shall determine the procedures and the extent of auditing required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 148.)
-------------------------------------------

282.

If the information is not made available through the assessor, the auditor may make written demand to the veteran or his spouse to appear and testify and to produce papers, including books, accounts, and documents germane to the claimed exemption, for the purpose of verifying entitlement to the exemption.

The auditor shall have access at any reasonable time to all records in the assessor’s office, germane to the audit.

The auditor shall have access at any reasonable time to all records in the assessor’s office, germane to the audit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 148.)
-------------------------------------------

282.5.

If a taxpayer refuses to comply with a written demand made pursuant to Section 282, the exemption shall be disallowed and, if an exemption has previously been allowed, an assessment pursuant to Section 531.1 shall be made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1035.)
-------------------------------------------

283.

Should the audit prescribed by this article indicate that a claim of exemption pursuant to subdivision (o), (p), (q) or (r) of Section 3, Article XIII of the Constitution has been improperly denied, the assessor shall be notified. Upon receipt of such notice the assessor shall make a redetermination and if he finds the claimant eligible he shall notify the claimant in the manner provided in Section 1605 of such erroneous determination, effect an amendment of the assessment roll, and if the claimant has already paid the tax he shall have 30 days from receipt of such notice in which to file claim pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 5096), Chapter 5, Part 9 of this division. The notice shall advise the time in which claim may be filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1079.)
-------------------------------------------

284.

Should the audit prescribed by this article indicate that a veteran’s exemption has been incorrectly allowed, the assessor shall be notified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 148.)
-------------------------------------------

285.

The provisions of this article shall not apply in any county unless a resolution is adopted by the board of supervisors declaring this article effective within the county.

Upon adoption of a resolution as so described, this article shall become operative in the county on the lien date next following the date of adoption. It shall remain effective within the county unless repealed by resolution of the board of supervisors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 499, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

286.

As used in this article “auditor” means the auditor, auditor-controller, or director of finance of a county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 148.)
-------------------------------------------

287.

(a) For property impacted by the 2025 Palisades Fire, Eaton Fire, Hurst Fire, Lidia Fire, Sunset Fire, or Woodley Fire, or the 2024 Mountain Fire or Franklin Fire, for which the Governor proclaimed a state of emergency, if the property received an exemption under this chapter for the 2025 calendar year and is no longer being utilized exclusively for the exempt purposes due to the
 damage
 or destruction of the property from the fires, the property shall be deemed to be used exclusively for the exempt purposes in compliance with this chapter if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The property has not changed ownership since the commencement date of the applicable disaster.

(2) The claimant demonstrates intent to reconstruct the property and resume the preexisting exempt purpose, as reflected in documented plans, permit submissions, financial commitments, or other documentation that can be reviewed by the assessor to confirm project viability.

(3) The claimant submits, along with any applicable annual filings required under this chapter, documentation that demonstrates that the claimant is proceeding with the intent of reconstructing the property.

(4) The claimant demonstrates that they are in the course of beginning the process of reconstruction of the property for the
 preexisting exempt purpose by December 31, 2033.

(b) (1) This
 section shall remain operative only for lien dates on or before January 1, 2033.

(2) This section shall be repealed as of December 31, 2033.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 549, Sec. 4.   (SB 663)   Effective October 10, 2025.   Repealed as of December 31, 2033, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Legal Description of Lands for Assessment Purposes [321. - 328.]

321.

Land shall be legally described for tax purposes pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

322.

If surveyed under the authority of the United States, land may be described by township, range, section, and fractional section, with its acreage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 311.)
-------------------------------------------

323.

If held under Spanish grant, land may be described by the exterior boundaries of the grants, or by the name of the grants, and the divisions, subdivisions, and acreage claimed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1941, Ch. 1240.)
-------------------------------------------

324.

City lots may be described by naming the city and giving the number of the lot and block, according to the system of numbering in the city.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

325.

When a map has been adopted as an official map under Division 3 (commencing with Section 66499.50) of Title 7 of the Government Code, land may be described by numbers or letters as shown on the official map.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1112.)
-------------------------------------------

326.

Whenever a map, other than an official map, has been furnished by the owner, claimant, or user of land, and it contains sufficient information clearly to identify the land, and it is properly identified by and filed with the assessor or the board, the land may be described by reference to this map.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

327.

Where any county or county officer possesses a complete, accurate map of any land in the county, or whenever such a complete, accurate map has been made in compliance with Sections 27556 to 27560, inclusive, of the Government Code, the assessor may number or letter the parcels in a manner approved by the board of supervisors. The assessor may renumber or reletter the parcels or prepare new map pages for any portion of such map to show combinations or divisions of parcels in a manner approved by the board of supervisors, so long as an inspection of such map will readily disclose precisely what land is covered by any particular parcel number or letter in the current or any prior fiscal year. This map or copy shall at all times be publicly displayed in the office of the assessor.

Land may be described by a reference to this map except that land shall not be described in any deed or conveyance by a reference to any such map unless such map has been filed for record in the office of the county recorder of the county in which such land is located.

All such maps in the possession of county assessors on August 27, 1937, and used for assessment purposes only, are deemed to have been numbered or lettered and approved properly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 204.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

327.1.

The board of supervisors of any county may enact, by a majority vote of its membership, an ordinance, resolution, or board order that requires any party that records a digital subdivision map with the county recorder to also file a duplicate digital copy of that map with the county assessor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 194, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

327.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the assessor shall not assign any parcel numbers or prepare a separate assessment or separate valuation to divide any existing residential structure into a subdivision, as defined in Section 66424 of the Government Code, until a subdivision final map or parcel map, as described in Sections 66434 and 66445, respectively, of the Government Code has been recorded as required by law. If the requirement for a parcel map is waived pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 66428 of the Government Code, then the assessor shall not assign any parcel numbers or prepare a separate assessment or separate valuation, unless the applicant provides a copy of the finding made by the legislative body or advisory agency, as required by that subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 281, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

328.

Land may be described by metes and bounds, or other description sufficient to identify it, giving the locality and an estimate of the number of acres.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 311.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Assessment Generally [401. - 681.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Requirements [401. - 409.]

401.

Every assessor shall assess all property subject to general property taxation at its full value.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1207.)
-------------------------------------------

401.3.

The assessor shall assess all property subject to general property taxation on the lien date as provided in Articles XIII and XIIIA of the Constitution and any legislative authorization thereunder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 608, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

401.4.

When valuing an owner-occupied single-family dwelling and the land on which it is situated that may be required for the convenient occupation and use of such dwelling, if such dwelling is on land which is zoned exclusively for single-family home use or which is zoned for agricultural use where single-family homes are permitted, the assessor shall not value the land at any value greater than that which would reflect the use of the land as a site for a single-family dwelling.

As used in this section, owner-occupied single-family dwelling means any single-family dwelling occupied by an owner thereof as his principal place of residence on the lien date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 208.)
-------------------------------------------

401.5.

The board shall issue to assessors data relating to costs of property, or, with respect to commercial and industrial property, shall, after a public hearing, review and approve commercially available data, and shall issue to assessors other information as in the judgment of the board will promote uniformity in appraisal practices and in assessed values throughout the state. An assessor shall adapt data received pursuant to this section to local conditions and may consider that data together with other factors as required by law in the assessment of property for tax purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1087, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

401.6.

(a) In any case in which the cost approach method is used to value special use property for purposes of taxation, the assessor shall not add a component for entrepreneurial profit unless he or she has market-derived evidence that entrepreneurial profit exists and has not been fully offset by physical deterioration or economic obsolescence.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Entrepreneurial profit” means either of the following:

(A) The amount a developer would expect to recover with respect to a property in excess of the amount of the developer’s costs incurred with respect to that property.

(B) The difference between the fair market value of a property and the total costs incurred with respect to that property.

(2) “Total costs” means both direct costs of construction, including, but not limited to, the costs of land, building materials, and labor, and indirect costs of construction, including, but not limited to, the costs of construction capital and permit fees.

(3) “Special use property” means a limited market property with a unique physical design, special construction materials, or a layout that restricts its utility to the use for which it was built.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 399, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

401.8.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, commencing with the 1995–96 fiscal year, the county assessor shall determine the property tax assessed value in the county attributable to assessable intercounty pipeline rights-of-way on the basis of a single, countywide parcel per taxpayer by combining the assessed values of each separate right-of-way interest, or segment thereof, of the taxpayer in the county. However, the assessor shall maintain a separate base year value as determined pursuant to Section 110.1 for each separate right-of-way interest, or segment thereof.

(b) Any assessment appeal that is authorized to be filed in Sections 401.10 to 401.12, inclusive, with respect to an intercounty pipeline right-of-way interest, or segment thereof, for which the assessor did not assign a value in the manner specified in subdivision (a) of Section 401.10, shall be filed by the taxpayer upon one or more specified intercounty pipeline right-of-way interests, or segments thereof, as described in subdivision (a), and in no event shall be filed with respect to a taxpayer’s entire, undivided intercounty pipeline right-of-way. The assessor shall maintain for five calendar years those records for each assessment year that identify each intercounty pipeline right-of-way interest, or segment thereof, located within his or her county, and shall provide the information in those records with respect to a given intercounty pipeline right-of-way interest, or segment thereof, to the taxpayer upon request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 801, Sec. 2.   Effective September 24, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

401.10.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law relating to the determination of the values upon which property taxes are based, values for each tax year from the 1984–85 tax year to the 2025–26 tax year, inclusive, for intercounty pipeline rights-of-way on publicly or privately owned property, including those rights-of-way that are the subject of a change in ownership, new construction, or any other reappraisable event during the period from March 1, 1975, to June 30, 2026, inclusive, shall be rebuttably presumed to be at full cash value for that year, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) (A) The full cash value is determined to equal a 1975–76 base year value, annually adjusted for inflation in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 2 of
 Article XIIIA of the California Constitution, and the 1975–76 base year value was determined in accordance with the following schedule:

(i) Twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) per mile for a high-density property.

(ii) Twelve thousand dollars ($12,000) per mile for a transitional-density property.

(iii) Nine thousand dollars ($9,000) per mile for a low-density property.

(B) For purposes of this section, the density classifications described in subparagraph (A) are defined as follows:

(i) “High density” means Category 1 (densely urban) as established by the State Board of Equalization.

(ii) “Transitional
 density” means Category 2 (urban) as established by the State Board of Equalization.

(iii) “Low density” means Category 3 (valley-agricultural), Category 4 (grazing), and Category 5 (mountain and desert) as established by the State Board of Equalization.

(2) The full cash value is determined utilizing the same property density classifications that were assigned to the property by the State Board of Equalization for the 1984–85 tax year or, if density classifications were not so assigned to the property for the 1984–85 tax year, the density classifications that were first assigned to the property by the board for a subsequent tax year.

(3) (A) If a taxpayer owns multiple pipelines in the same right-of-way, an additional 50 percent of the value attributed to the right-of-way for the presence of
 the first pipeline, as determined under paragraphs (1) and (2), shall be added for the presence of each additional pipeline up to a maximum of two additional pipelines. For any particular taxpayer, the total valuation for a multiple pipeline right-of-way shall not exceed 200 percent of the value determined for the right-of-way of the first pipeline in the right-of-way in accordance with paragraphs (1) and (2).

(B) If the State Board of Equalization has determined that an intercounty pipeline, located within a multiple pipeline right-of-way previously valued in accordance with subparagraph (A), has been abandoned as a result of physical removal or blockage, the assessed value of the right-of-way attributable to the last pipeline enrolled in accordance with subparagraph (A) shall be reduced by not less than 75 percent of that increase in assessed value that resulted from the application of subparagraph (A).

(4) If all pipelines of a taxpayer located within the same pipeline right-of-way, previously valued in accordance with this section, are determined by the State Board of Equalization to have been abandoned as the result of physical removal or blockage, the assessed value of that right-of-way to that taxpayer shall be determined to be no more than 25 percent of the assessed value otherwise determined for the right-of-way for a single pipeline of that taxpayer pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2).

(b) If the assessor assigns values for any tax year from the 1984–85 tax year to the 2025–26 tax year, inclusive, in accordance with the methodology specified in subdivision (a), the taxpayer’s right to assert any challenge to the right to assess that property, whether in an administrative or judicial proceeding, shall be deemed to have been raised and resolved for that tax year and the values
 determined in accordance with that methodology shall be rebuttably presumed to be correct. If the assessor assigns values for any tax year from the 1984–85 tax year to the 2025–26 tax year, inclusive, in accordance with the methodology specified in subdivision (a), any pending taxpayer lawsuit that challenges the right to assess the property shall be dismissed by the taxpayer with prejudice as it applies to intercounty pipeline rights-of-way.

(c) Notwithstanding any change in ownership, new construction, or decline in value occurring after March 1, 1975, if the assessor assigns values for rights-of-way for any tax year from the 1984–85 tax year to the 2025–26 tax year, inclusive, in accordance with the methodology specified in subdivision (a), the taxpayer may not challenge the right to assess that property and the values determined in accordance with that methodology shall be rebuttably presumed to be correct for that property for that tax
 year.

(d) Notwithstanding any change in ownership, new construction, or decline in value occurring after March 1, 1975, if the assessor does not assign values for rights-of-way for any tax year from the 1984–85 tax year to the 2025–26 tax year, inclusive, at the 1975–76 base year values specified in subdivision (a), any assessed value that is determined on the basis of valuation standards that differ, in whole or in part, from those valuation standards set forth in subdivision (a) shall not benefit from any presumption of correctness, and the taxpayer may challenge the right to assess that property or the values for that property for that tax year. As used herein, a challenge to the right to assess shall include any assessment appeal, claim for refund, or lawsuit asserting any right, remedy, or cause of action relating to or arising from, but not limited to, the following or similar contentions:

(1) That the value of the right-of-way is included in the value of the underlying fee or railroad right-of-way.

(2) That assessment of the value of the right-of-way to the owner of the pipeline would result in double assessment.

(3) That the value of the right-of-way may not be assessed to the owner of the pipeline separately from the assessment of the value of the underlying fee.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, during a four-year period commencing on January 1, 1996, the assessor may issue an escape assessment in accordance with the specific valuation standards set forth in subdivision (a) for the following taxpayers and tax years:

(1) Any intercounty pipeline right-of-way
 taxpayer who was a plaintiff in Southern Pacific Pipe Lines, Inc. v. State Board of Equalization (1993) 14 Cal.App.4th 42, for the tax years 1984–85 to 1996–97, inclusive.

(2) Any intercounty pipeline right-of-way taxpayer who was not a plaintiff in Southern Pacific Pipe Lines, Inc. v. State Board of Equalization (1993) 14 Cal.App.4th 42, for the tax years 1989–90 to 1996–97, inclusive.
